Tennessee, session 114, SB1494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3402, is amended by deleting
"grades one through six (1-6)" wherever it appears in the section and substituting "grades one
through five (1-5)" and by deleting "grades seven through twelve (7-12)" wherever it appears in
the section and substituting "grades six through twelve (6-12)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1494
010352
- 1 -